Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
D. Officers

Reasonableness of increased executive salaries, due to “increased responsibilities,” not established

In a stockholder's derivative action, the defendants-directors-corporate officers did not establish the reasonableness of their executive salaries, which were doubled as a result of “increased responsibilities,” in that they did not specify what these responsibilities entailed, presented no evidence of increased earnings, did not attempt to establish how their salaries compared with those of executives in similar businesses, nor explain increasing their salaries while refusing to declare a dividend for nonexecutive shareholders. Lynch v. Patterson, 701 P.2d 1126,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 493

(Wyo. 1985).

Law reviews

For article, “Inherent Authority of a Corporate President in Wyoming,” see V Wyo. L.J. 93 (1950).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references

18B Am. Jur. 2d Corporations §§ 1455 to 1714.

Power of president to have corporation institute litigation where a board of directors has failed or refused to grant permission, 10 ALR2d 701.

Purchase of claims against corporation by officer thereof, 13 ALR2d 1172.

Inspection of books and records of corporation by officers thereof, 15 ALR2d 11.

Right of corporate officer to purchase corporate assets from corporation, 24 ALR2d 71.

Power of corporate agent to hire employees for life, 28 ALR2d 929.

Power of corporation with respect to payment of remuneration, bonus and the like, to widow or family of deceased officer, 29 ALR2d 1262.

Validity of contract between corporations as affected by officers in common, 33 ALR2d 1060.

Authority of officer to bind corporation as guarantor or surety; express authority by bylaw or resolution, 34 ALR2d 290; 37 ALR2d 453.

Applicability of statute of frauds to promise by officer to pay debt of corporation, 35 ALR2d 906.

Authority of corporate agent to endorse and transfer commercial paper, 37 ALR2d 453.

Power of particular officer or agent of business corporation to bind it by a donation to a charity or similar institution, 50 ALR2d 447.

Authority of president to subordinate corporation's claim, assignment, lien or the like, 53 ALR2d 1421.

Authority of corporate officers to mortgage or pledge corporate personal property, 62 ALR2d 712.

Power of secretary or treasurer to institute corporate litigation, 64 ALR2d 900.

Power of president of corporation to commence or carry on arbitration proceedings, 65 ALR2d 1321.

Criminal liability of corporate officer who issues worthless checks in corporate name, 68 ALR2d 1269.

Personal liability of one who endorses without qualification commercial paper of corporation, 82 ALR2d 424.

Agent's authority to execute warrant of attorney to confess judgment against principal, 92 ALR2d 952.

Power and authority of president of business to execute commercial paper, 96 ALR2d 549.

Liability of officers for negligence in permitting conversion of property of third persons by corporations, 29 ALR3d 660.

Liability of officer for commission or compensation received from third person in connection with that person's transaction with the corporation, 47 ALR3d 373.

Personal liability of officer on corporate checks issued against insufficient funds, 47 ALR3d 1250.

Admissibility of parol evidence to show whether guaranty of corporation's obligation was signed in officer's representative or individual capacity, 70 ALR3d 1276.

Financial inability of corporation to take advantage of business opportunity as affecting determination whether “corporate opportunity” was presented, 16 ALR4th 185.

Purchase of shares of corporation by director or officer as usurpation of “corporate opportunity,” 16 ALR4th 784.

Fairness to corporation where “corporate opportunity” is allegedly usurped by officer or director, 17 ALR4th 479.

19 C.J.S. Corporations §§ 433 to 553.

§ 17-16-840.
Required officers.

A corporation has the officers described in its bylaws or appointed by the board of directors in accordance with the bylaws.

The board of directors may elect individuals to fill one (1) or more offices of the corporation. An officer may appoint one (1) or more officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

The bylaws or the board of directors shall assign to one (1) of the officers responsibility for preparing minutes of the directors’ and shareholders’ meetings and for maintaining and authenticating records of the corporation required to be kept under W.S. 17-16-1601(a) and (e).

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one (1) office in a corporation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b), added the first sentence, and deleted “or assistant officers” after “more officers” in the last sentence; in (c), substituted “assign” for “delegate,” added “maintaining and” and “required to be kept under W.S. 17-16-1601(a) and (e)”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 17-16-841.
Functions of officers.

Each officer has the authority and shall perform the functions set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the functions prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the functions of other officers.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “functions” for “duties” wherever it appears.

Applied

in

Metz Beverage Co. v. Wyo. Beverages, Inc., 2002 WY 21,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 20

, 39 P.3d 1051 (Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Squaw Mt. Cattle Co. v. Bowen, 804 P.2d 1292,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 17-16-842.
Standards of conduct for officers.

An officer when performing in such capacity, has the duty to act:

In good faith;

With the care that a person in a like position would reasonably exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner the officer reasonably believes to be in or at least not opposed to the best interests of the corporation.

The duty of an officer includes the obligation:

To inform the superior officer to whom, or the board of directors or the committee thereof to which, the officer reports of information about the affairs of the corporation known to the officer, within the scope of the officer’s functions, and known to the officer to be material to the superior officer, board or committee; and

To inform the officer’s superior officer, or another appropriate person within the corporation, or the board of directors, or a committee thereof, of any actual or probable material violation of law involving the corporation or material breach of duty to the corporation by an officer, employee or agent of the corporation, that the officer believes has occurred or is likely to occur.

In discharging his duties an officer who does not have knowledge that makes reliance unwarranted is entitled to rely on:

The performance of properly delegated responsibilities by one (1) or more employees of the corporation whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in performing the responsibilities delegated; or

Information, opinions, reports or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, prepared or presented by one (1) or more employees of the corporation whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented or by legal counsel, public accountants or other persons retained by the corporation as to matters involving skills or expertise the officer reasonably believes are matters:

Within the particular person’s professional or expert competence; or

As to which the particular person merits confidence.

An officer shall not be liable to the corporation or its shareholders for any decisions to take or not to take action as an officer, or any failure to take any action, if he performed the duties of his office in compliance with this section. Whether an officer who does not comply with this section shall have liability shall depend in such instance on applicable law, including those principles of W.S.

17-16-831

that have relevance.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, an officer, in determining what he reasonably believes to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, shall consider the interests of the corporation’s shareholders and, in his discretion, may consider any of the following:

The interests of the corporation’s employees, suppliers, creditors and customers;

The economy of the state and nation;

The impact of any action upon the communities in or near which the corporation’s facilities or operations are located;

The long-term interests of the corporation and its shareholders, including the possibility that those interests may be best served by the continued independence of the corporation; and

Any other factors relevant to promoting or preserving public or community interests.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (a) which read: “(a) An officer with discretionary authority shall discharge his duties under that authority:

“(i) In good faith;

“(ii) With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

“(iii) In a manner he reasonably believes to be in or at least not opposed to the best interests of the corporation”; added present (b) and redesignated former (b) as present (c); rewrote (c), which read: “(c) In discharging his duties an officer is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

“(i)
One (1) or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented; or

“(ii)
Legal counsel, public accountants or other persons as to matters the officer reasonably believes are within the person's professional or expert competence.”; deleted former (c), which read: “(c) An officer is not acting in good faith if he has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (b) of this section unwarranted”; and rewrote (d), which read: “(d) An officer is not liable for any action taken as an officer, or any failure to take any action, if he performed the duties of his office in compliance with this section.”

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-843.
Resignation and removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by delivering notice to the corporation. A resignation is effective when the notice is delivered unless the notice specifies a later effective time. If a resignation is made effective at a later time and the board or appointing officer accepts the future effective time, the board or appointing officer may fill the pending vacancy before the effective time if the board or appointing officer provides that the successor does not take office until the effective time.

An officer may be removed at any time with or without cause by:

The board of directors;

The officer who appointed such officer, unless the bylaws or the board of directors provide otherwise; or

Any other officer if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

In this section, “appointing officer” means the officer, including any successor to that officer, who appointed the officer resigning or being removed.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the section, which read: “(a) An officer may resign at any time by delivering notice to the corporation. A resignation is effective when the notice is delivered unless the notice specifies a later effective date. If a resignation is made effective at a later date and the corporation accepts the future effective date, its board of directors may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board of directors provides that the successor does not take office until the effective date.

“(b) A board of directors may remove any officer at any time with or without cause.”

§ 17-16-844.
Contract rights of officers.

The appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights.

An officer’s removal does not affect the officer’s contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer’s resignation does not affect the corporation’s contract rights, if any, with the officer.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.